Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Chapter 56. Mississippi Technology Transfer Office

§ 57-56-1.
Mississippi Technology Transfer Office.

There is hereby created and established the Mississippi Technology Transfer Office located in the space allocated to the State of Mississippi within the Mississippi Technology Transfer Center at the National Space Technology Laboratories, National Aeronautics and Space Administration, in Hancock County, Mississippi, hereinafter referred to as “NSTL,” which office shall be administered and staffed by the Department of Economic Development.

The position of State Director of Technology Transfer is hereby established, and the Director of the Mississippi Department of Economic Development shall employ a senior scientist-administrator to fill the position of State Director of Technology Transfer, who is hereby designated as Mississippi’s official technology transfer representative at NSTL.

The State Director of Technology Transfer shall have the following duties and responsibilities:

Manage and control the Mississippi Technology Transfer Office, and recommend from time to time to the Governor such utilization of space available in the Mississippi Technology Transfer Center deemed appropriate as having a direct impact on the transfer of technology;

Establish a mechanism through which utilization of available space within the center can best be determined to be in the state’s best interest;

Provide an office for and maintain liaison with NSTL’s Technology Utilization Officer for a direct interface with federal laboratory expertise for NSTL’s technology transfer and economic development endeavors;

Assist the Director of the University Research Center to examine the potential for including the establishment at or near NSTL of university research centers in engineering, science or technology in the strategy and planning for any future research and development programs for the state, such university centers to focus on areas of fundamental research and technology that are scientifically promising and have the potential to contribute to Mississippi’s long-term economic competitiveness and growth;

Encourage and facilitate collaboration among state and local governments, universities, the private sector, particularly small business, and NSTL and other federal laboratories in order to assist in the transfer of science and technology to the marketplace;

Facilitate communication, coordination and cooperation between state and local technology transfer organizations and the Offices of Research and Technology Applications of federal laboratories; and

Prepare and submit quarterly to the Governor and the Director of the Department of Economic Development a report summarizing the activities performed by the Mississippi Technology Transfer Office.

The Mississippi Technology Transfer Office shall have the following functions and duties:

In order to ensure that Mississippi benefits from and fully exploits scientific research and technology developed at NSTL and other federal laboratories, participate with NSTL not only in generating new knowledge and understanding in advanced technologies, but also in encouraging the swiftest possible transfer of federally developed science and technology to the private sector of the state;

Be the conduit between and among NSTL and other federal laboratories and consortiums, state and local governments, universities and the private sector for the transfer of technology developed from federal research and development efforts at NSTL;

Provide state and local governments, universities and the private sector with information on technology, expertise and facilities available at NSTL and other federal laboratories;

Identify areas of research and technology of potential importance to long-term state economic competitiveness;

Cooperate with and assist NSTL in broadening Mississippi’s technology base by moving new knowledge from the research laboratory into the development of new products and processes;

Provide a clearinghouse for requests received at NSTL for technical assistance from state agencies, units of local governments, businesses, industrial development organizations, not-for-profit organizations including universities, federal agencies and laboratories and other persons;

Assist the private sector of Mississippi to participate, where appropriate, in federal technology exchange programs whereby scientists and engineers in the private sector may take temporary assignments in federal laboratories, and scientists and engineers in federal laboratories may take temporary assignments in the private sector;

When requested, assist NSTL, colleges or universities, businesses, not-for-profit organizations, state agencies, local governments or regional organizations to establish programs to stimulate research and to encourage technology transfer in such areas as technology program development, curriculum design, long-term research planning, personnel needs projections and productivity assessments; and

Encourage and participate in the establishment and operation of centers at or near NSTL, which centers may be affiliated with any university or other nonprofit institution, or any group thereof, that will have as objectives:

The enhancement of technological innovation through the participation of individuals from federal laboratories, industry, universities and other nonprofit institutions, or any group thereof, in cooperative technological innovation activities; and

The improvement of mechanisms for the dissemination of scientific, engineering and technical information among federal laboratories, universities, other nonprofit institutions and industry.

The public interest demands and the general welfare requires this procedure so that the comprehensive state policy on technology transfer may be implemented in the most effective, efficient and economical manner.

It shall be the duty of every department, agency, office, institution and political subdivision of the State of Mississippi, and the officers thereof, to cooperate with and assist the Mississippi Technology Transfer Office and the State Director of Technology Transfer in every reasonable way.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 91, eff from and after July 1, 1988.